California statutes. Public Contract Code
(2) If the costs for completing all remaining design, preconstruction, and construction activities sufficient to complete and close out the project exceed the guaranteed maximum price, the costs exceeding the guaranteed maximum price shall be the responsibility of the design-build entity. If the costs for these activities are less than the guaranteed maximum price, the design-build entity shall not be entitled to the difference between the costs and the guaranteed maximum price, unless there is a prior written agreement concerning sharing of these proceeds. For purposes of this section, cost shall include the design-build entity’s direct costs, general conditions, overhead, and fee. 

(f) If the district and the design-build entity do not reach agreement on a guaranteed maximum price, or the district otherwise elects not to amend the design-build entity’s contract to complete the remaining work, the district may solicit proposals to
 complete the project from other firms that submitted statements of qualifications or requests for proposals. The district may also, upon written determination that it is in the best interest of the district to do so, formally solicit proposals from other design-build entities. 

(g) (1) The district, in each design-build request for qualifications, may identify specific types of subcontractors that shall be included in the design-build entity’s statement of qualifications. All construction subcontractors that are identified in the statement of qualifications shall be afforded the protections of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1.

(2) Following award of the design-build contract, except for those construction subcontractors listed in the statement of qualifications, the design-build entity shall proceed as listed in this subdivision in awarding
 construction subcontracts with a value exceeding one-half of 1 percent of the contract price allocable to construction work.

(A) Provide public notice of availability of work to be subcontracted in accordance with the publication requirements applicable to the competitive bidding process of the district, including a fixed date and time on which qualifications statements, bids, or proposals will be due.

(B) Establish reasonable qualification criteria and standards.

(C) Award the subcontract either on a best value basis or to the lowest responsible bidder. The process may include prequalification or short-listing.

(3) Subcontractors awarded construction subcontracts under this subdivision shall be afforded all the protections of Chapter 4 (commencing with
 Section 4100) of Part 1. 

(4) A construction subcontractor licensed pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code that provides design services used on a project authorized by this section shall not be subject to any liability arising from their design if the construction subcontract for that design is not performed by that subcontractor.

(5) If the district and the design-build entity do not reach agreement on a guaranteed maximum price, or the district otherwise elects not to amend the design-build entity’s contract to complete the remaining work, and the district elects to contract with a new design-build entity to complete the remaining work, the design professionals responsible for performing design services on behalf of the design-build entity shall have sole liability for their design errors and omissions. 

(h) (1) The district shall submit to the relevant committees of the Legislature, on or before January 1, 2027, a report containing a description of each public works project procured by the district through the progressive design-build process described in this article that is completed after January 1, 2023, and before December 1, 2026.

(2) The report shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following information:

(A) A description of the project and the design-build entity that was awarded the contract for the project.

(B) The initial estimated, actual final project costs, and guaranteed maximum price.

(C) An assessment of the selection process and criteria
 required by this article.

(D) An assessment of the effects of the progressive design-build process described in this article on cost and schedule for the project.

(E) The number of specialty subcontractors listed by construction trade type, on each project, that provided construction services, but did not meet the target price for their scope of work.

(F) Whether or not any portion of a design prepared by the specialty subcontractor that did not perform the construction work for that design was used by the district.

(G) In instances where the district determined that the guaranteed maximum price of any subcontract exceeded the anticipated target price for that portion of the project, which subcontracts were impacted and on what basis the district
 determined what the anticipated target price was.

(H) The number of specialty subcontractors listed by construction trade type, on each project, that meet the definition of a small business under subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 14837 of the Government Code.

(I) The number of specialty subcontractors listed by construction trade type, on each project, that meet the definition of a microbusiness under paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 14837 of the Government Code.

(3) The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code and may be combined with the report required pursuant to Section 21568.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 275, Sec. 2.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21568.5.

The procurement process for Construction Manager/General Contractor method projects shall proceed as follows:

(a) (1) The district shall establish a procedure for the evaluation and selection of a construction manager through a request for qualifications (RFQ). The RFQ shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) If the construction manager
 is a partnership, limited partnership, or other association, a list of all the partners, general partners, or association members known at the time of the statement of qualifications submission who will participate in the Construction Manager/General Contractor method contract.

(B) Evidence that the members of the construction manager have completed, or demonstrated the experience, competency, capability, and capacity to complete, projects of similar size, scope, or complexity, and that proposed key personnel have sufficient experience and training to competently manage and complete construction of the project, as well as a financial statement that assures the district that the construction manager has the capacity to complete the project, construction expertise, and an acceptable safety record.

(C) The licenses, registration, and credentials required to construct the project,
 including information on the revocation or suspension of any license, registration, or credential.

(D) Evidence that establishes the construction manager has the capacity to obtain all required payment and performance bonding, liability insurance, and errors and omissions insurance.

(E) Any prior serious or willful violation of the California Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1973 (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of the Labor Code), or the federal Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (Public Law 91-596), settled against any member of the construction manager, and information concerning workers’ compensation experience history and worker safety program.

(F) Information concerning any debarment, disqualification, or removal from a federal, state, or local government public works project. Any instance in
 which a construction manager, its owners, officers, or managing employees submitted a bid on a public works project and were found to be nonresponsive or were found by an awarding body not to be a responsible bidder.

(G) Any instance in which the construction manager, or its owners, officers, or managing employees, defaulted on a construction contract. 

(H) Any violations of the Contractors State License Law (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code), excluding alleged violations of federal or state law including the payment of wages, benefits, apprenticeship requirements, or personal income tax withholding, or of the Federal Insurance Contributions Act (26 U.S.C. Sec. 3101 et seq.) withholding requirements settled against any member of the construction manager. 

(I) Information concerning the bankruptcy or receivership of any member of the construction manager, including information concerning any work completed by a surety.

(J) Information concerning all settled adverse claims, disputes, or lawsuits between the owner of a public works project and any member of the construction manager during the five years preceding submission of a bid pursuant to this section, in which the claim, settlement, or judgment exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). Information shall also be provided concerning any work completed by a surety during this period.

(K) In the case of partnership or other association that is not a legal entity, a copy of the agreement creating the partnership or association and specifying that all partners or association members agree to be fully liable for the performance under the contract. 

(L) For the purpose of this paragraph, a construction manager’s safety record shall be deemed acceptable if their experience modification rate for the most recent three-year period is an average of 1.00 or less, and their average total recordable injury/illness rate and average lost work rate for the most recent three-year period does not exceed the applicable statistical requirements for its business category.

(2) The information required pursuant to this subdivision shall be verified under oath by the construction manager and its members in the manner in which civil pleadings in civil actions are verified. Information that is not a public record pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) shall not be open to public inspection.

(b) For each RFQ, the district shall generate a final list of qualified persons or firms that participated in the RFQ prior to entering into negotiations on the contract for which the RFQ applies.

(c) (1) For each contract included in the RFQ, the district shall enter into negotiations for the contract with the highest qualified person or firm on the final list for that contract. However, if the RFQ is for multiple contracts and specifies that all of the multiple contracts will be awarded to a single construction manager, there may be a single negotiation for all the multiple contracts. The negotiations shall include consideration of compensation and other contract terms that the district determines to be fair and reasonable to the district. In making this decision, the district shall take into account the estimated value, the scope, the complexity, and the nature of the professional services or construction
 services to be rendered. If the district is not able to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the highest qualified person or firm on the final list regarding compensation and on other contract terms the district determines to be fair and reasonable, the district shall formally terminate negotiations with that person or firm. The district may undertake negotiations with the next most qualified person or firm on the final list in sequence until an agreement is reached or a determination is made to reject all persons or firms on the final list.

(2) If a contract for construction services is entered into pursuant to this section and includes preconstruction services by the construction manager, the district shall enter into a written contract with the construction manager for preconstruction services under which contract the district shall pay the construction manager a fee for preconstruction services in an amount agreed upon by the district and
 the construction manager. The preconstruction services contract may include fees for services to be performed during the contract period, provided, however, that the district shall not request or obtain a fixed price or a guaranteed maximum price for the construction contract from the construction manager or enter into a construction contract with the construction manager until after the district has entered into a preconstruction services contract. A preconstruction services contract shall provide for the subsequent negotiation for construction of all or any discrete phase or phases of the project.

(3) A contract for construction services shall be awarded after the plans have been sufficiently developed and either a fixed price or a guaranteed maximum price has been successfully negotiated. In the event that a fixed price or a guaranteed maximum price is not negotiated, the district shall not award the contract for construction services.

(4) The district is not required to award the construction services contract.

(5) Construction shall not commence on any phase, package, or element until the district and a construction manager agree in writing on either a fixed price that the district will pay for the construction to be commenced or a guaranteed maximum price for the construction to be commenced and a construction schedule for the project. 

(d) All subcontractors bidding on contracts pursuant to this article shall be afforded the protections contained in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1. The construction manager shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide public notice of the availability of work to be subcontracted in accordance with the publication requirements
 applicable to the competitive bidding process of the district.

(2) Provide a fixed date and time on which the subcontracted work will be awarded in accordance with the procedure established pursuant to this article.

(3) Comply with any subcontracting procedures adopted by the district that were included in the district’s RFQ. If the district has adopted procedures to prequalify public works contractors, the construction manager may use the procedures to prequalify subcontractors.

(e) (1) The district shall submit to the relevant committees of the Legislature, on or before January 1, 2027, a report that describes each Construction Manager/General Contractor project approved under this article.

(2) The report shall provide relevant
 data on each project that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The cost of the project.

(B) The state of completion for the project.

(C) The estimated time of completion for the project.

(D) A comprehensive assessment of the effectiveness of the Construction Manager/General Contractor project delivery method relative to project cost and time savings.

(3) The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code and may be combined with the report required pursuant to Section 21568.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 275, Sec. 2.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21568.6.

(a) A design-build entity, construction manager, or construction contractor shall not be awarded a construction contract unless it provides an enforceable commitment to the district that the design-build entity, construction manager, or construction contractor and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades, in
 accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1.

(b) This subdivision shall not apply if any of the following requirements are met:

(1) The district has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce, and the design-build entity, construction manager, or construction contractor agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement.

(2) The design-build entity, construction manager, or construction contractor has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the design-build entity or construction contractor and all its subcontractors at every tier performing the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(c) For purposes of this subdivision, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 275, Sec. 2.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21568.7.

(a) The district may not award a design-build-operate contract for any project pursuant to this article. A contract may, however, cover operations during a training or transition period.

(b) The district shall perform construction inspection services for all projects authorized and awarded pursuant to this article, and it shall use district employees to the fullest extent possible, and then consultants under contract
 with the district to perform these services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 275, Sec. 2.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21568.8.

Any design-build entity or Construction Manager/General Contractor that is selected to construct a project pursuant to this article shall possess or obtain sufficient bonding to cover the contract amount for construction services and risk and liability insurance the district may require. Any payment or performance bond written for the purposes of this article shall be written using a bond form developed by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 275, Sec. 2.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21568.9.

If the district elects to award a project pursuant to this article, retention proceeds withheld by the district from the design-build entity or Construction Manager/General Contractor shall not exceed 5 percent if a performance and payment bond, issued by an admitted surety insurer, is required in the solicitation of bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 275, Sec. 2.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21568.10.

Nothing in this article affects, expands, alters, or limits any rights or remedies otherwise available at law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 275, Sec. 2.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21568.11.

(a) The provisions of this article pertaining to the progressive design-build and Construction Manager/General Contractor delivery methods shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date are inoperative. 

(b) The provisions of this article pertaining to design-build shall remain in effect in accordance with Section 22169.

(c) A
 contract awarded pursuant to this article before the applicable portions of the article are inoperative shall continue in full force and effect until completion, including any subsequently executed changes to the contract, or termination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 275, Sec. 2.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 122. Madera County Flood Control and Water Conservation Agency [21570. - 21572.]

21570.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Madera County Flood Control and Water Conservation Agency, as provided for in Chapter 916 of the Statutes of 1969.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21571.

The agency shall have the power to make contracts, employ labor, and do all acts necessary for the full exercise of its purpose and powers. Those contracts determined by the board to be let for bid shall be in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board for the letting of contracts for such agency. The board may determine to have any work or services performed by contract, or employees of the agency, or in any combination thereof which is economical and expedient for the purpose of the agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21572.

Any improvement or unit of work, except as provided in this article, estimated to cost in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000), shall be done by contract and let to the lowest responsible bidder in the manner provided in this article. The board of directors of the agency shall advertise by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation published in the agency, inviting sealed proposals for the construction of the work before any contract shall be made, and may let by contract separately any part of the work. The board shall require the successful bidder to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board, conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract,
 and upon the payment of the claims for labor and material, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code, and to be subject to the provisions of that title. The board shall also have the right to reject any and all bids, and readvertise for new bids, or by a two-thirds vote may elect to undertake the work by force account. In the event no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement, or where the estimated cost of such work does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), the board of directors by unanimous vote of all members present may without advertising for bids have the work done by force account. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). The agency may purchase in the open market without advertisement for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work either under contract or by force
 account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 98.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 123. Tulare County Flood Control District [21580. - 21581.]

21580.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Tulare County Flood Control District, as provided for in Chapter 1149 of the Statutes of 1969.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21581.

(a) Any improvement or unit of work when the cost according to the estimate of the engineer will exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), shall be done by contract and shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders in the manner provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit or shall be divided into severable parts, or both, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall call for bids and advertise the call by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed in the district inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work before any
 contract is made. The call for bids shall state whether the work is to be performed as a unit or shall be divided into severable specific parts, or both, as stated in the call. The board may let the work by single contract for the whole or it may divide the work into severable parts by separate contracts, as stated in the call, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall require the successful bidder or bidders to file with the board a good and sufficient bond to be approved by the board conditioned upon the payment of their claims for labor and material, the bond to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code and to be subject to the provisions of that title. The board shall also have the right to reject any and all bids and readvertise for new bids, or by a two-thirds vote may elect to undertake the work by force account.

(b) In the event
 no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement, or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board of supervisors may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by employees of the district, by day labor, under the direction of the board, by contract, or by any combination of those methods. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(c) The district may acquire in the open market without advertising for bids, materials, equipment, and supplies for use in any work or for any other purpose; provided, however, that materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvement, except work referred to in subdivision (b), may not be purchased if the cost exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000),
 without advertising for bids and awarding the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 99.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 124. Bighorn Mountains Water Agency [21590. - 21591.]

21590.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Bighorn Mountains Water Agency, as provided for in Chapter 1175 of the Statutes of 1969.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21591.

(a) Any improvement or unit of work, when the cost, according to the estimate of the engineer, will exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), shall be done by contract and shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders as provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit or divided into severable parts. The board shall advertise for bids by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the agency, if there is a newspaper printed and published in the agency, inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work. The call for bids shall
 state whether the work shall be performed in one unit or divided into parts. The work may be let under a single contract or several contracts, as stated in the call. The board shall require the successful bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material. The bonds shall comply with Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code. The board may reject any and all bids and readvertise, or by a two-thirds vote may elect to undertake work by force account.

(b) If no proposals are received, or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board may have the work done by force account without advertising for bids. In case of an emergency, if
 notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(c) The agency may purchase in the open market without advertising for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work, either under contract or by force account; provided, however, that materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvement, except work referred to in subdivision (b), may not be purchased if the cost exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), without advertising for bids and awarding the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 100.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 125. Tuolumne County Water Agency [21600. - 21601.]

21600.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Tuolumne County Water Agency, as provided for in Chapter 1236 of the Statutes of 1969.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21601.

Any improvement or unit of work, when the cost, according to the estimate of the engineer, will exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), shall be done by contract and let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders as provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit or divided into severable parts. The board shall advertise for bids by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation, or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation, printed and published in the agency, inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work. The call for bids shall state whether the work shall be performed in one unit or divided into parts. The work may be let under
 a single contract or several contracts, as stated in the call. The board shall require the successful bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon payment of their claims for labor and material. The bonds shall comply with Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code. The board may reject any and all bids and readvertise, or, by a two-thirds vote, may elect to undertake the work by force account. If no proposals are received, the estimated cost of the work does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board of supervisors may have the work done by force account without advertising for bids. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). The district may purchase in the open
 market without advertising for bids, materials, and supplies for use in any work, either under contract or by force account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 101.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 126. Tahoe-Truckee Sanitation Agency [21610. - 21618.]

21610.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Tahoe-Truckee Sanitation Agency, as provided for in Chapter 1560 of the Statutes of 1971.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21611.

As used in this article:

(a) “Public entity” means and includes the United States, the state and any county, city, public corporation, or public district of the state, and any department, entity, agency, or authority of any thereof.

(b) “Private corporation” means and includes any private corporation organized under the laws of the United States or of any state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21612.

The agency may join with one or more public entities, private corporations, or other persons for the purpose of carrying out any of the powers of the agency, and for that purpose may contract with any such other public entity, private corporation, or person to finance acquisitions, constructions, and operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21613.

Any contract with any other public entity, private corporation, or person may provide for contributions to be made by each party thereto, for the division and apportionment of the benefits, services, and products thereof. Any such contract may also provide that the agency will effect any acquisition or carry on any operations, and may contain such other and further covenants and agreements as may be necessary or convenient to accomplish the purposes thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21614.

The agency may prescribe methods for construction of works and for the letting of contracts for any of the following purposes:

(a) The construction of works, structures, or equipment;

(b) The performance or furnishing of labor, materials, or supplies necessary or convenient for carrying out any of the purposes of this act; or

(c) The acquisition or disposal of any real or personal property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21615.

When any agency expenditure exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), it shall be contracted for and let to the lowest responsible bidder after notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21616.

The board may establish the manner of calling for bids and letting contracts, and all contracts shall be entered into upon such terms and in such manner as the board may authorize.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21617.

If no bids are received upon any call for bids, the board may let the contract without further complying with Section 159 of Chapter 1560 of the Statutes of 1971.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21618.

In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 81.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 127. Monterey Peninsula Water Management District [21620. - 21624.]

21620.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Monterey Peninsula Water Management District, as provided for in Chapter 527 of the Statutes of 1977.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21621.

Any improvement or unit of work, when the cost, according to the estimate of the engineer, will exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), shall be done by contract and shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders in the manner provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit or shall be divided into severable parts, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall call for bids and advertise the call by publication pursuant to Section 6061.3 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation published or circulated in the district, inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work before any contract is made. The call for bids shall state whether the work is to be performed as a unit or is to be divided into parts, as stated in the call. The board may let the work by single contract or it may divide the work into parts by separate contracts, as stated in the call.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 142, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

21622.

The board shall require the successful bidder or bidders to file with the board, good and sufficient bonds, to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material in connection therewith. Such contracts shall be subject to the provisions of Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 102.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

21623.

The board shall also have the right to reject any and all bids and readvertise for new bids, or by a two-thirds vote may elect to undertake such work by force account. When no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement therefor, or when the estimated cost of such work does not exceed the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000), or when the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work necessary in order to protect life and property from impending damage, the board may, without advertising for bids therefor, have such work done by employees of the district by day labor under the direction of the board, by contract, or by a combination thereof. The district shall have the power to acquire in the open market without advertising for bids therefor, materials, equipment, and supplies for use in any work or for any other purpose; provided, however, that materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvement, except work referred to in the preceding sentence, may not be purchased if the cost thereof exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000) without advertising for bids and awarding the contract therefor to the lowest responsible bidder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21624.

In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 83.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 128. Merced County Flood Control District [21630. - 21631.]

21630.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Merced County Flood Control District, as provided for in Chapter 1311 of the Statutes of 1982.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21631.

(a) Any improvement or unit of work when the cost, according to the estimate of the engineer, will exceed six thousand five hundred dollars ($6,500), shall be done by contract and shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders in the manner provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit, or shall be divided into severable parts, or both, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall call for bids and advertise the call by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed in the district inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work